Rhode Island statutes. Title 32 Parks and Recreational Areas
Chapter 1 General Provisions

32-1-1.
[Superseded.]

32-1-2.
Transfer of authority from department of agriculture and conservation.

Wherever in any general or public law there is assigned to the division of forests, parks, and parkways within the department of agriculture and conservation authority for the establishment, maintenance, or development of parks and recreation areas, this authority shall be transferred to the division of parks and recreation within the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-2

.

32-1-3.
Acquisition of land — Riparian rights — Control of land use.

To more effectually carry out the purposes of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, the department of environmental management may acquire by purchase, gift, devise, or condemnation, lands, easements, rights, and interests in land for a park, recreation ground, or bathing beach in any part of the state, whether that property is situated in the cities or towns in which its powers may be exercised under the provisions of §

32-2-1

, or is situate in any other city or town; provided, that all property other than tide-flowed lands acquired by condemnation shall remain subject to all rights of riparian proprietors on any waters bordering upon the property, that no riparian rights shall be taken, destroyed, impaired, or affected by the condemnation, that all riparian proprietors shall have the right to continue to maintain, repair, or reconstruct dams and their appurtenances now existing on the waters bordering upon that property and for this purpose to enter upon that property, restoring it after repair or reconstruction to its previous condition as nearly as may be, and shall continue to enjoy the same rights of flowage with respect to that property that the riparian proprietors have heretofore used and enjoyed. Subject to the foregoing provisions of this section, the department may use, or permit the use of, property, acquired by it under the provisions of this section and the waters bordering thereon, for bathing, boating, fishing, and skating, and shall have the same authority, supervision, and control over that property as it has over other property acquired by the department under other provisions of this chapter or any other law.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 279, § 15; P.L. 1927, ch. 1031, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-3

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 52.

32-1-4.
Procedure for condemnation of land.

For the purpose of acquiring by condemnation any of the lands, estates, and interests therein authorized to be taken by §

32-1-3

, the director of the department of environmental management shall have the powers conferred, and be subject to the duties imposed, upon towns taking property under the provisions of chapter 15 of title 39, so far as those powers and duties are consistent with the provisions of §

32-1-3

and appropriate for the purposes thereof. A description, plat, and statement of any land or any estate or interest therein taken as described in § 32-1-3 shall be signed by the director of the department and filed in the records of land evidence as required by chapter 15 of title 39 with respect to takings thereunder, and the owner of any land, estate, or interest therein taken under the authority of § 32-1-3 shall have the same right of petition and of jury trial thereon and all other rights given or secured to owners of property taken under chapter 15 of title 39.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 16; P.L. 1927, ch. 1031, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-4

.

32-1-5.
Leases and concessions.

The department may let, rent, or lease such parts of the parks or reservations under its control or any building thereon and may grant any concessions on or about those parks and reservations, as in the opinion of the director of the department may deem necessary or advisable, but not for periods in excess of twenty-five (25) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1742, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-5

; P.L. 1973, ch. 221, § 1.

32-1-5.1.
John L. Curran state park — Prohibition of development.

John L. Curran state park, comprised of two hundred sixty three (263) acres, more or less, located within the city of Cranston, shall not at any time be commercially developed or in any way modified from its current undeveloped state; nor shall the land be used for any purpose other than passive outdoor recreation; nor shall the land be sold, leased, or otherwise conveyed or transferred except that short-term leasing of one year or less may be allowed provided such lease does not allow, or at any time result in, the development of the land or in any way alter the land’s current undeveloped state. The land shall be designated “open space” within the meaning of §

45-36-1

. For purposes of this section, “passive outdoor recreation” shall mean the use of land for natural areas, nature trails, forests, wetlands and marsh lands preservation, wildlife habitat, hunting, fishing, boating, swimming, picnicing, gardening, and scenic preservation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 271, § 1.

32-1-6.
Warrants for violations within parks.

There shall be power vested in the director of environmental management, and all park police officers, sergeants, lieutenants, and captains commissioned in accordance with the provisions of §

32-2-10

, to issue and to sign complaints for any persons apprehended within the limits of the properties under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental management for violation of the provisions of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title and of the rules and regulations promulgated by the director of the department relative to wilful damage to, or defacing of, state park property; dumping on state park property; refusal to clean up debris by persons responsible; violations of motor vehicle laws; hunting, trapping, and discharging firearms in any state park; public meetings and parades without permit; and unlawful interference with police or lifeguards in the performance of their duties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 18; P.L. 1956, ch. 3731, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-6

; P.L. 1971, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 66, § 1.

32-1-7.
Monuments placed under department.

The monument erected by the state in the city of Providence in memory of Stephen Hopkins, and the lot, the monument erected by the state in the town of Charlestown in memory of Hon. Joseph Stanton, Jr., and the lot, the monuments erected by the state on the Fort Neck lot and Indian Burial Ground Hill lot, in the town of Charlestown, and all lands owned by the state and not now used by any department of the state government, are hereby placed in the care and custody of the department of environmental management which, in respect to those lots and lands, shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed in this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 17; P.L. 1929, ch. 1383, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-7

.

32-1-8.
Perry monument.

The director of environmental management shall have charge of monuments erected by the state in various locations as noted in §

32-1-7

, and, in addition thereto, the monument erected in memory of Oliver Hazard Perry in Island cemetery, and for that purpose shall expend such sums of money as may be from time to time appropriated by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 103; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-8

.

32-1-9.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums so appropriated, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1322, § 4; P.L. 1907, ch. 1465, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1909, ch. 422, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1742, § 4; P.L. 1920, ch. 1837, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2085, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 4; P.L. 1926, ch. 824, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1357, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1718, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-9

.

32-1-10.
Employees — Records — Annual report.

The director of environmental management shall determine the duties of all employees, remove them in the manner provided by chapter 4 of title 36, and make all reasonable rules and regulations concerning them. The maps, plans, documents, records, books, papers, and accounts of the department shall be subject to public inspection at such times as the director may determine. The director shall make an annual report to the general assembly together with a full statement of the receipts and disbursements of the division of parks and recreation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 824, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1357, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

32-1-10

.

32-1-11.
Senator James C. Maher cross country ski trail system.

The cross-country ski trails at Pulaski state park shall hereafter be named the Senator James C. Maher cross-country ski trail system. The trails within this system shall hereafter be named after revolutionary war generals as follows:

The Pulaski Trail shall hereafter be named the General Sullivan trail;

The Hemlock Glen Trail shall hereafter be named the General Lafayette Trail;

The Covered Bridge Trail shall hereafter be named the General Greene Trail; and

The Woods Trail shall hereafter be named the General Rochambeau Trail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 491, § 1.

32-1-11.1.
Les Pawson Loop.

The road encircling Olney Pond in Lincoln Woods state park shall hereafter be named the Les Pawson Loop.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

32-1-11.2.
Edward S. Payne Overlook.

The state overlook at Mohegan Bluffs, in the town of New Shoreham, shall hereafter be named the Edward S. Payne Overlook.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 259, § 1.

32-1-11.3.
Nathaniel S. Lewis Memorial Boat Landing.

The state boat landing presently under the control of the department of environmental management, located in the village of Alton, shall hereafter be named the Nathaniel S. Lewis Memorial Boat Landing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 299, § 1.

32-1-11.4.
Vin Gormley Trail.

The hiking trail encircling Watchaug Pond in Burlingame state park shall hereafter be known as the Vin Gormley Trail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 374, § 1.

32-1-11.5.
Sri Chinmoy Oneness — Home Peace Run Causeway.

The causeway at the Beach Pond Area in Exeter at the Connecticut border shall hereafter be named the Sri Chinmoy Oneness — Home Peace Run Causeway, and shall be marked by a plaque provided by the Rhode Island Sri Chinmoy centre.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 401, § 1.

32-1-11.6.
Dr. Fred R. Alofsin Sailing and Event Building.

The quartermaster’s docks located at Fort Adams state park shall hereafter be named in honor of Dr. Fred R. Alofsin and the mule barn located in the park shall be named the Dr. Fred R. Alofsin Sailing and Event Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 10, § 1.

32-1-11.7.
Lester DiRiso Bike Path Tunnel.

The bike path tunnel on the East Bay Bike Path at the Bridge Street underpass in the town of Warren shall hereafter be named the Lester DiRiso Bike Path Tunnel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 469, § 1.

32-1-11.8.
Leo C. Sullivan Memorial East Bay Bike Path.

The section of the East Bay Bike Path located in the city of East Providence shall hereafter be named the Leo C. Sullivan Memorial East Bay Bike Path.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 66, § 1.

32-1-11.9.
Senator John H. Chafee Memorial Park.

The state park located in the Town of Lincoln on Lonsdale Avenue and Route 123 which the Blackstone River Bike Path will run through shall hereafter be named the “Senator John H. Chafee Memorial Park”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 244, § 1.

32-1-11.10.
John ‘Jack’ F. Duffy Field B Shelter.

The Field B Pavilion at Lincoln Woods State Park located in the town of Lincoln shall be named the “John ‘Jack’ F. Duffy Pavilion.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 584, § 1.

32-1-12.
Supervision of fund.

The recreation area development fund shall be expended under the direction and supervision of the director of the department of environmental management for the development of state-owned beaches, parks, and recreation areas, and the director is vested with all power and authority necessary or incidental to the purposes of §§

32-1-11

—

32-1-13

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-1-12

; P.L. 1966, ch. 169, § 1.

32-1-13.
Authority to obtain federal assistance.

The director is authorized for and on behalf of the state, with the approval of the governor, to apply for and accept from the federal government or any department or agency thereof assistance that may become available for the purposes of §§

32-1-11

—

32-1-13

, whether it be in the form of a loan or grant or otherwise; to accept the provisions of any federal legislation or regulations therefor; to enter into contracts in connection therewith; and to act as agent for the federal government in connection therewith or to designate a subordinate so to act. To obtain federal assistance, the director is authorized to comply with any federal law, rules, and regulations thereunder and to meet such federal requirements as may be made conditions precedent to receiving federal assistance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-1-13

; P.L. 1966, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 52.

32-1-14.
Misquamicut State Beach.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws, one-half (1/2) the daily cash parking fees collected on Saturday, Sunday, and holidays at Misquamicut state beach shall be paid to the town of Westerly until a total of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) has been paid.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-1-14

; P.L. 1966, ch. 206, § 1.

32-1-15.
Local permission to use state parks.

Any person, firm, or corporation requesting use of a state park for concerts, shows, exhibitions, or other similar gatherings shall first obtain the written permission to use the park from the licensing authority of the town or city where said park is located. The department of environmental management shall not permit the use of a park without the written permission required by this section, provided, however, that any person, firm, or corporation who or that is denied written permission to use the park from the licensing authority of the town or city where the park is located shall have the right to an immediate appeal to the department of environmental management for a hearing on the propriety of the denial of that written permission. The hearing shall be de novo and written notice of the appeal shall be given to the licensing authority of the city or town involved at the same time the written notice of appeal is given to the department of environmental management. The administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42, shall apply to all appeals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 52.

32-1-16.
Preference for residents with disabilities.

Residents of Rhode Island who have a disability shall be given preference in the use of campsites and other recreational facilities over nonresidents who apply for permission to use those facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 76; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 76.

32-1-17.
Persons with disabilities.

No fee shall be charged any person with a disability regardless of age, or to automobiles transporting a non-driver with a disability, at any recreational facility owned and operated by the state; provided, however, proper identification is presented as prescribed by the department of environmental management. For the purpose of this section “person with a disability” shall mean an individual who has a physical or mental impairment and is receiving:

Social security disability benefits (SSDI);

Supplemental security income benefits (SSI); or

Veterans benefits and who shall be determined under applicable federal law by the federal department of veterans’ affairs to be one hundred percent (100%) disabled through a service-connected disability.

For purpose of this section, “fees” shall include all fees for parking, admittance, or other user fees for playing golf. The term “fees” shall not include licensing fees, camping fees, picnic table fees, or specialized facility use fees, including, but not limited to, fees for the use of equestrian areas, performing arts centers, game fields, and mule shed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 127, § 1.

32-1-18.
Senior citizens.

No entrance fee shall be charged to any person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older and who is eligible to participate in the Rhode Island pharmaceutical assistance to the elderly program, and an entrance fee not exceeding one-half (1/2) of the established and posted rates shall be charged to any other person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older at any recreational facility owned and operated exclusively by the state, excepting docking slips; provided, however, proper identification is presented as prescribed by the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 14, § 1.

32-1-19.
Ten Mile River state park — Regulation of use and vehicles — Penalties for violations.

No person shall stop, stand, or park any vehicle within the Ten Mile River state park between the hours of eleven p.m. (11:00 p.m.) and six a.m. (6:00 a.m.), nor shall any person enter or remain upon the premises of the Ten Mile River state park during those hours. No person shall operate, or be in actual physical control of, any motorcycle, motor scooter, or other motor driven cycle within the Ten Mile River state park except within the area designated for their use or parking. Every person convicted of any violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less than five dollars ($5.00), nor more than one hundred and fifty dollars ($150), or by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 228, § 1.

32-1-20.
Goddard park — Exemption for disabled veteran.

Any veteran who is a resident of the state, and who shall be determined under applicable federal law by the federal department of veterans’ affairs to be totally disabled through a service-connected disability, shall be exempt from paying any fee to play golf at the Goddard park golf course.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 107, § 1.

32-1-21.
Snake Den Park — Restrictions on future use.

The park in the town of Johnston, known as Snake Den Park, shall not be used as a water park, as herein defined, or for an amusement park. “Water park” shall, for the purposes of this section, mean any man-made swimming pool, pond, lake, or water-supplied area designed and/or used for recreation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 292, § 1.